Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4082.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 44, chapter 9, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 27, to read: ARTICLE 27. SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORMS START_STATUTE44-1383. Social media platforms; age restriction; requirements; attorney general; enforcement; definitions A. A social media platform shall restrict A user who is under sixteen years of age from accessing online social media content and from engaging in online social interaction. B. An owner or a provider of a social media platform shall: 1. Take reasonable steps to prevent a user who is under sixteen years of age from creating an account with the social media platform and from engaging in online social interaction. 2. Create, maintain and document reasonable safety measures that include all of the following: (a) Age-appropriate design features. (b) Default safety settings to prevent a user who is under sixteen years of age from accessing the social media platform. (c) Internal escalation systems that alert when a user who is under sixteen years of age accesses the social media platform. 3. Develop, implement and maintain reasonable safeguards for identifying, mitigating and responding to foreseeable risks of harm that are associated with designing, operating and using the social media platform. 4. Publish and maintain a written safety and risk mitigation policy that includes all of the following: (a) the categories of risks to users that the social media platform has identified. (b) the specific procedural, technical and organizational safeguards that the social media platform has implemented to mitigate each category of risk. (c) how the social media platform evaluates and updates the effectiveness of the safeguards. 5. Conduct an annual risk assessment that: (a) Identifies and evaluates foreseeable risks of harm to users. (b) Documents and Assesses the effectiveness of the safeguard included in the risk mitigation policy. (c) Identifies new or emerging risks. 6. Maintain and preserve records of compliance for at least three years that include both of the following: (a) Written policies. (b) Risk assessments. C. The attorney general may investigate and take appropriate action as prescribed in chapter 10, article 7 of this title. D. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Online social interaction": (a) Means an interaction that enables a user to share material for social purposes. (b) Does not include online business transactions. 2. "Social media platform" means an online service that does all of the following: (a) provides online social interaction between two or more end users. (b) allows end users to link to or interact with other end users. (c) allows End users to share material for social purposes on the  social media platform. (d) Does not include: (i) Online business transactions. (ii) Advertising. END_STATUTE